Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.220

Provisions of prior laws superseded by chapter.

Whenever a review board has been created pursuant to the terms of this chapter, the provisions of law relating to city annexation review boards set forth in chapter 35.13 RCW and the powers granted to the boards of county commissioners to alter boundaries of proposed annexations or incorporations shall not be applicable.

[ 1967 c 189 s 22.]